extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ve asmar ásmen/XxV1V2 asmar
SFX Ve asmar ásman/XxV1V2 asmar
SFX Ve asmiar ásmio/XxV3V4 asmiar
SFX Ve asmiar ásmies/XxV7V8 asmiar
SFX Ve asmiar ásmias/XxV7V8 asmiar
SFX Ve asmiar ásmie/XxV1V2V3V4 asmiar
SFX Ve asmiar ásmien/XxV1V2 asmiar
SFX Ve asmiar ásmian/XxV1V2 asmiar
SFX Ve asnar ásno/XxV3V4 asnar
SFX Ve asnar ásnes/XxV7V8 asnar
SFX Ve asnar ásnas/XxV7V8 asnar
SFX Ve asnar ásne/XxV1V2V3V4 asnar
SFX Ve asnar ásnen/XxV1V2 asnar
SFX Ve asnar ásnan/XxV1V2 asnar
SFX Ve aspar áspo/XxV3V4 aspar
SFX Ve aspar áspes/XxV7V8 aspar
SFX Ve aspar áspas/XxV7V8 aspar
SFX Ve aspar áspe/XxV1V2V3V4 aspar
SFX Ve aspar áspen/XxV1V2 aspar
SFX Ve aspar áspan/XxV1V2 aspar
SFX Ve aspiar áspio/XxV3V4 aspiar
SFX Ve aspiar áspies/XxV7V8 aspiar
SFX Ve aspiar áspias/XxV7V8 aspiar
SFX Ve aspiar áspie/XxV1V2V3V4 aspiar
SFX Ve aspiar áspien/XxV1V2 aspiar
SFX Ve aspiar áspian/XxV1V2 aspiar
SFX Ve aspir áspo/XxV3V4 aspir
SFX Ve aspir áspas/XxV7V8 aspir
SFX Ve aspir áspa/XxV1V2V3V4 aspir
SFX Ve aspir áspan/XxV1V2 aspir
SFX Ve astar ásto/XxV3V4 astar
SFX Ve astar ástes/XxV7V8 astar
SFX Ve astar ástas/XxV7V8 astar
SFX Ve astar áste/XxV1V2V3V4 astar
SFX Ve astar ásten/XxV1V2 astar
SFX Ve astar ástan/XxV1V2 astar
SFX Ve astiar ástio/XxV3V4 astiar
SFX Ve astiar ásties/XxV7V8 astiar
SFX Ve astiar ástias/XxV7V8 astiar
SFX Ve astiar ástie/XxV1V2V3V4 astiar
SFX Ve astiar ástien/XxV1V2 astiar
SFX Ve astiar ástian/XxV1V2 astiar
SFX Ve astir ásto/XxV3V4 astir
SFX Ve astir ástas/XxV7V8 astir
SFX Ve astir ásta/XxV1V2V3V4 astir
SFX Ve astir ástan/XxV1V2 astir
SFX Ve astrar ástro/XxV3V4 astrar
SFX Ve astrar ástres/XxV7V8 astrar
SFX Ve astrar ástras/XxV7V8 astrar
SFX Ve astrar ástre/XxV1V2V3V4 astrar
SFX Ve astrar ástren/XxV1V2 astrar
SFX Ve astrar ástran/XxV1V2 astrar
SFX Ve astriar ástrio/XxV3V4 astriar
SFX Ve astriar ástries/XxV7V8 astriar
SFX Ve astriar ástrias/XxV7V8 astriar
SFX Ve astriar ástrie/XxV1V2V3V4 astriar
SFX Ve astriar ástrien/XxV1V2 astriar
SFX Ve astriar ástrian/XxV1V2 astriar
SFX Ve atar áto/XxV3V4 atar
SFX Ve atar átes/XxV7V8 atar
SFX Ve atar átas/XxV7V8 atar
SFX Ve atar áte/XxV1V2V3V4 atar
SFX Ve atar áten/XxV1V2 atar
SFX Ve atar átan/XxV1V2 atar
SFX Ve ater áto/XxV3V4 ater
SFX Ve ater átas/XxV7V8 ater
SFX Ve ater áta/XxV1V2V3V4 ater
SFX Ve ater átan/XxV1V2 ater
SFX Ve atiar átio/XxV3V4 atiar
SFX Ve atiar áties/XxV7V8 atiar
SFX Ve atiar átias/XxV7V8 atiar
SFX Ve atiar átie/XxV1V2V3V4 atiar
SFX Ve atiar átien/XxV1V2 atiar
SFX Ve atiar átian/XxV1V2 atiar
SFX Ve atir áto/XxV3V4 atir
SFX Ve atir átas/XxV7V8 atir
SFX Ve atir áta/XxV1V2V3V4 atir
SFX Ve atir átan/XxV1V2 atir
SFX Ve atrar átro/XxV3V4 atrar
SFX Ve atrar átres/XxV7V8 atrar
SFX Ve atrar átras/XxV7V8 atrar
SFX Ve atrar átre/XxV1V2V3V4 atrar
SFX Ve atrar átren/XxV1V2 atrar
SFX Ve atrar átran/XxV1V2 atrar
SFX Ve atriar átrio/XxV3V4 atriar
SFX Ve atriar átries/XxV7V8 atriar
SFX Ve atriar átrias/XxV7V8 atriar
SFX Ve atriar átrie/XxV1V2V3V4 atriar
SFX Ve atriar átrien/XxV1V2 atriar
SFX Ve atriar átrian/XxV1V2 atriar
SFX Ve atuar átuo/XxV3V4 atuar
SFX Ve atuar átuas/XxV7V8 atuar
SFX Ve atuar átuan/XxV1V2 atuar
SFX Ve aucar áuco/XxV3V4 aucar
SFX Ve aucar áuques/XxV7V8 aucar
SFX Ve aucar áucas/XxV7V8 aucar
SFX Ve aucar áuque/XxV1V2V3V4 aucar
SFX Ve aucar áuquen/XxV1V2 aucar
SFX Ve aucar áucan/XxV1V2 aucar
SFX Ve auchar áucho/XxV3V4 auchar
SFX Ve auchar áuches/XxV7V8 auchar
SFX Ve auchar áuchas/XxV7V8 auchar
SFX Ve auchar áuche/XxV1V2V3V4 auchar
SFX Ve auchar áuchen/XxV1V2 auchar
SFX Ve auchar áuchan/XxV1V2 auchar
SFX Ve audar áudo/XxV3V4 audar
SFX Ve audar áudes/XxV7V8 audar
SFX Ve audar áudas/XxV7V8 audar
SFX Ve audar áude/XxV1V2V3V4 audar
SFX Ve audar áuden/XxV1V2 audar
SFX Ve audar áudan/XxV1V2 audar
SFX Ve audir áudo/XxV3V4 audir
SFX Ve audir áudas/XxV7V8 audir
SFX Ve audir áuda/XxV1V2V3V4 audir
SFX Ve audir áudan/XxV1V2 audir
SFX Ve aular áulo/XxV3V4 aular
SFX Ve aular áules/XxV7V8 aular
SFX Ve aular áulas/XxV7V8 aular
SFX Ve aular áule/XxV1V2V3V4 aular
SFX Ve aular áulen/XxV1V2 aular
SFX Ve aular áulan/XxV1V2 aular
SFX Ve auliar áulio/XxV3V4 auliar
SFX Ve auliar áulies/XxV7V8 auliar
SFX Ve auliar áulias/XxV7V8 auliar
SFX Ve auliar áulie/XxV1V2V3V4 auliar
SFX Ve auliar áulien/XxV1V2 auliar
SFX Ve auliar áulian/XxV1V2 auliar
SFX Ve aullar áullo/XxV3V4 aullar
SFX Ve aullar áulles/XxV7V8 aullar
SFX Ve aullar áullas/XxV7V8 aullar
SFX Ve aullar áulle/XxV1V2V3V4 aullar
SFX Ve aullar áullen/XxV1V2 aullar
SFX Ve aullar áullan/XxV1V2 aullar
SFX Ve aunar áuno/XxV3V4 aunar
SFX Ve aunar áunes/XxV7V8 aunar
SFX Ve aunar áunas/XxV7V8 aunar
SFX Ve aunar áune/XxV1V2V3V4 aunar
SFX Ve aunar áunen/XxV1V2 aunar
SFX Ve aunar áunan/XxV1V2 aunar
SFX Ve aunir áuno/XxV3V4 aunir
SFX Ve aunir áunas/XxV7V8 aunir
SFX Ve aunir áuna/XxV1V2V3V4 aunir
SFX Ve aunir áunan/XxV1V2 aunir
SFX Ve aupar áupo/XxV3V4 aupar
SFX Ve aupar áupes/XxV7V8 aupar
SFX Ve aupar áupas/XxV7V8 aupar
SFX Ve aupar áupe/XxV1V2V3V4 aupar
SFX Ve aupar áupen/XxV1V2 aupar
SFX Ve aupar áupan/XxV1V2 aupar
SFX Ve aurar áuro/XxV3V4 aurar
SFX Ve aurar áures/XxV7V8 aurar
SFX Ve aurar áuras/XxV7V8 aurar
SFX Ve aurar áure/XxV1V2V3V4 aurar
SFX Ve aurar áuren/XxV1V2 aurar
SFX Ve aurar áuran/XxV1V2 aurar
SFX Ve ausar áuso/XxV3V4 ausar
SFX Ve ausar áuses/XxV7V8 ausar
SFX Ve ausar áusas/XxV7V8 ausar
SFX Ve ausar áuse/XxV1V2V3V4 ausar
SFX Ve ausar áusen/XxV1V2 ausar
SFX Ve ausar áusan/XxV1V2 ausar
SFX Ve autar áuto/XxV3V4 autar
SFX Ve autar áutes/XxV7V8 autar
SFX Ve autar áutas/XxV7V8 autar
SFX Ve autar áute/XxV1V2V3V4 autar
SFX Ve autar áuten/XxV1V2 autar
SFX Ve autar áutan/XxV1V2 autar
SFX Ve auzar áuzo/XxV3V4 auzar
SFX Ve auzar áuces/XxV7V8 auzar
SFX Ve auzar áuzas/XxV7V8 auzar
SFX Ve auzar áuce/XxV1V2V3V4 auzar
SFX Ve auzar áucen/XxV1V2 auzar
SFX Ve auzar áuzan/XxV1V2 auzar
SFX Ve auñar áuño/XxV3V4 auñar
SFX Ve auñar áuñes/XxV7V8 auñar
SFX Ve auñar áuñas/XxV7V8 auñar
SFX Ve auñar áuñe/XxV1V2V3V4 auñar
SFX Ve auñar áuñen/XxV1V2 auñar
SFX Ve auñar áuñan/XxV1V2 auñar
SFX Ve avar ávo/XxV3V4 avar
SFX Ve avar áves/XxV7V8 avar
SFX Ve avar ávas/XxV7V8 avar
SFX Ve avar áve/XxV1V2V3V4 avar
SFX Ve avar áven/XxV1V2 avar
SFX Ve avar ávan/XxV1V2 avar
SFX Ve aviar ávio/XxV3V4 aviar
SFX Ve aviar ávies/XxV7V8 aviar
SFX Ve aviar ávias/XxV7V8 aviar
SFX Ve aviar ávie/XxV1V2V3V4 aviar
SFX Ve aviar ávien/XxV1V2 aviar
SFX Ve aviar ávian/XxV1V2 aviar
SFX Ve axar áxo/XxV3V4 axar
SFX Ve axar áxes/XxV7V8 axar
SFX Ve axar áxas/XxV7V8 axar
SFX Ve axar áxe/XxV1V2V3V4 axar
SFX Ve axar áxen/XxV1V2 axar
SFX Ve axar áxan/XxV1V2 axar
SFX Ve ayar áyo/XxV3V4 ayar
SFX Ve ayar áyes/XxV7V8 ayar
SFX Ve ayar áyas/XxV7V8 ayar
SFX Ve ayar áye/XxV1V2V3V4 ayar
SFX Ve ayar áyen/XxV1V2 ayar
SFX Ve ayar áyan/XxV1V2 ayar
SFX Ve ayer áyo/XxV3V4 ayer
SFX Ve ayer áyas/XxV7V8 ayer
SFX Ve ayer áya/XxV1V2V3V4 ayer
SFX Ve ayer áyan/XxV1V2 ayer
SFX Ve azar ázo/XxV3V4 azar
SFX Ve azar áces/XxV7V8 azar
SFX Ve azar ázas/XxV7V8 azar
SFX Ve azar áce/XxV1V2V3V4 azar
SFX Ve azar ácen/XxV1V2 azar
SFX Ve azar ázan/XxV1V2 azar
SFX Ve azcar ázco/XxV3V4 azcar
SFX Ve azcar ázques/XxV7V8 azcar
SFX Ve azcar ázcas/XxV7V8 azcar
SFX Ve azcar ázque/XxV1V2V3V4 azcar
SFX Ve azcar ázquen/XxV1V2 azcar
SFX Ve azcar ázcan/XxV1V2 azcar
SFX Ve azmiar ázmio/XxV3V4 azmiar
SFX Ve azmiar ázmies/XxV7V8 azmiar
SFX Ve azmiar ázmias/XxV7V8 azmiar
SFX Ve azmiar ázmie/XxV1V2V3V4 azmiar
SFX Ve azmiar ázmien/XxV1V2 azmiar
SFX Ve azmiar ázmian/XxV1V2 azmiar
SFX Ve aznar ázno/XxV3V4 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznes/XxV7V8 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznas/XxV7V8 aznar
SFX Ve aznar ázne/XxV1V2V3V4 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznen/XxV1V2 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznan/XxV1V2 aznar
SFX Ve azniar áznio/XxV3V4 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznies/XxV7V8 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznias/XxV7V8 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznie/XxV1V2V3V4 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznien/XxV1V2 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznian/XxV1V2 azniar
SFX Ve aznir ázno/XxV3V4 aznir
SFX Ve aznir áznas/XxV7V8 aznir
SFX Ve aznir ázna/XxV1V2V3V4 aznir
SFX Ve aznir áznan/XxV1V2 aznir
SFX Ve añar áño/XxV3V4 añar
SFX Ve añar áñes/XxV7V8 añar
SFX Ve añar áñas/XxV7V8 añar
