extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
ablancar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aburagañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acarrapetar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
achucar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acorazar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acurrinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afarar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aforcar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
agasayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
agurupar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alitar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
almibarar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amaricar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amiñonar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ampollar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anogar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apallabrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apedrexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apiensar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apopar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aquerindar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrampiñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrefundir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arriostrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aseñaldar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asumir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aterecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atortoxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aupar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
axepar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
bachear/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
batucar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
bortelar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cafetiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
candiliar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
carretiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cerrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
chiscar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
circunvalar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
comencipiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
conmemorar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
copar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cuartar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
decatase/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
derrocar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desagarrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desapilancar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desavezar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desconxestionar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencaxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenrugar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
deshinchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
despinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
deyanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
drenar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
embazacar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emburrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empatabellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empollericar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encalletar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encartiyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encodar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
endemoñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enforquetar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engatusar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engurullar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enquillotrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ensandecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enterriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entrepolar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enxaburcar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esbaboriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esblanquisnar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escadeyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escandoliar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escarpuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esclasar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escorteyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escupir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esfiltrayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgalochar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgoyerar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmagayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmondiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espaciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espatayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espeyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esposar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estampinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estongar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estrombonar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
eszarramiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
fatiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
focexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
fricar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
gandatiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
golpiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
gurniar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
inchentar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
inventar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
llapar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
lloramiquiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
malparir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
martirizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mexucar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mozquetar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
nesgar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
observar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
palicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
patayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
pertenecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
planchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
prefabricar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
pruir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
ramaliar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rebagar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recoldar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reflundiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
remedar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
repoliquiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
resplandir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
revilvar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rollar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
saltar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
significar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
solicitar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
soscribir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sustituir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tartir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tirguir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tragar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tresmitir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tundir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
varar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
xabonar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
xirpiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
